Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Recreational Trails Authority

148.795.
Kentucky Recreational Trails Authority — Purpose — Membership — Meetings — Land use agreements for recreational purposes — General use permits — Authority may hold property for public use — Proceeds. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 152, § 11, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 16, § 25, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, §
139, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 65, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 164, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

148.796.
Strategy to increase recreational activity on private land — Landowner’s permission required for entry on private land. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2017 ch. 164, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.